North Carolina, session 2025, HB1080.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PUBLIC TRANSIT SAFETY MODERNIZATION
SECTION 1.(a) Article 2B of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 136-44.28. Emergency trauma kits and first aid training.
(a) All public transportation operators receiving State funds, including any metropolitan
transit authority, regional transit authority, or municipal transit system operating bus, rail, light
*H1080-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
rail, commuter rail, streetcar, or other fixed-route public transportation services within this State,
shall equip every revenue service vehicle, including each bus and each individual train car, with
an emergency trauma response kit.
(b) Each emergency trauma response kit shall include, at minimum, all of the following
items:
(1) Commercially manufactured tourniquets.
(2) Hemostatic dressings.
(3) Pressure bandages.
(4) Trauma shears.
(5) Protective gloves and other appropriate personal protective equipment.
(6) Any additional lifesaving supplies recommended by the Department of Health
and Human Services in consultation with the Department of Public Safety.
(c) All operators and supervisory personnel employed by a public transportation system
shall complete emergency first aid and bleeding control training consistent with nationally
recognized standards, including training in the proper use of tourniquets and trauma response
kits. Such training shall be completed within six months of hire and refreshed at least once every
two years. An employee who renders emergency aid in good faith pursuant to this section shall
be afforded the protections of G.S. 90-21.14.
(d) The Department of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the Department
of Transportation and the Department of Public Safety, shall adopt minimum implementation
standards to ensure consistency across public transportation systems."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 2B of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 136‑44.29. Fare enforcement and anti-fare-dodging measures.
(a) All public transportation operators receiving State funds shall implement reasonable
and effective measures to deter and prevent fare evasion. Such measures shall include all of the
following:
(1) Installation and use of physical access control systems, including turnstiles or
gated entry systems where operationally and structurally practicable based on
facility design.
(2) Use of electronic validation systems, including barcode scanners, mobile
ticket validation, or contactless fare verification technology.
(3) In-person fare inspection programs, including uniformed or plainclothes fare
inspectors.
(4) Randomized fare verification protocols.
(5) Any other technology or enforcement practice determined appropriate by the
governing board of the transit authority.
(b) Each public transportation operator shall adopt written fare enforcement policies that
balance revenue protection, public safety, and equitable enforcement and shall make such
policies publicly available."
SECTION 1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the provisions of G.S. 136‑44.28 and G.S. 136‑44.29, as
enacted in this section. Funds appropriated in this section shall be distributed by the Department
of Transportation to public transportation operators receiving State funds through a
formula-based allocation consistent with existing public transportation funding formulas
administered by the Department. Funds may be used for:
(1) Purchase and installation of emergency trauma response kits.
(2) Training of transit personnel in first aid and bleeding control.
(3) Capital expenditures associated with fare enforcement modernization,
including access control systems and electronic fare validation technology.
Page 2 House Bill 1080-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Associated implementation and compliance costs.
SECTION 1.(d) Beginning no later than December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter,
each public transportation operator receiving State funds shall submit a report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Transportation, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Justice and Public Safety, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include, at
minimum:
(1) Estimated fare evasion rates for the preceding fiscal year.
(2) Total fare revenue collected.
(3) Estimated revenue losses attributable to fare evasion.
(4) A description of anti-fare-dodging measures in place.
(5) Enforcement actions taken, including citations or warnings issued.
(6) Capital investments made to deter fare evasion.
(7) Any safety incidents involving public transportation personnel or passengers.
The Department of Transportation shall compile and publish a statewide summary
report aggregating data from all reporting transit authorities. No later than December 1, 2027, the
Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Transportation, the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, and the Fiscal Research Division
on the use of funds appropriated under this section, including the amounts distributed to each
transit authority, the categories of expenditures, and the status of statewide compliance with the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 1.(e) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

COURT SYSTEM STAFFING FOR WAKE AND MECKLENBURG COUNTIES
SECTION 2.(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from
the General Fund to the Administrative Office of the Courts (AOC) the sum of thirty million
dollars ($30,000,000) in recurring funds to be used to hire in Wake and Mecklenburg Counties
assistant and deputy clerk of court positions. The AOC shall determine the appropriate allocation
of positions between the counties and, no later than 60 days after the allocation, provide a report
to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Fiscal Research
Division on (i) the number of positions allocated to each county and (ii) the reasoning used in
determining those numbers.
SECTION 2.(b) Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from
the General Fund to the AOC, Budget Fund 100072, the sum of thirty million dollars
($30,000,000) in recurring funds to be used to hire in Wake and Mecklenburg Counties assistant
district attorney positions. Notwithstanding G.S. 7A-60, the AOC shall determine the appropriate
allocation of positions between the counties and, no later than 60 days after the allocation,
provide a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and
the Fiscal Research Division on (i) the number of positions allocated to each county and (ii) the
reasoning used in determining those numbers.
SECTION 2.(c) No later than July 1, 2027, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services,
in coordination with the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall provide a report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the status of the
appropriation contained in this section, including (i) cost-savings to the court system, (ii)
reductions in case loads, (iii) reductions in the State's incarcerated population, and (iv) any
impacts on recidivism. An updated report shall be provided no later than December 1, 2027, and
annually thereafter.

FUNDING FOR SALARY INCREASES AND WORKPLACE SAFETY
IMPROVEMENTS AT THE DEPARTMENT OF ADULT CORRECTION
House Bill 1080-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Adult Correction (DAC) the sum of two hundred fifty million
dollars ($250,000,000) in recurring funds to be used for (i) salary increases for employees of the
DAC to align with current market rates and attract and retain qualified employees and (ii) costs
incurred from improving workplace safety. For any funds used for salary increases, the DAC
shall determine how to allocate the funds appropriated in this section and, no later than 60 days
after the allocation, provide a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and
Public Safety and the Fiscal Research Division on (i) the positions receiving a salary increase,
(ii) the amount of the salary increase for each position, and (iii) rationale for each salary increase
provided.

PROVIDE COMPENSATION INCREASES TO MEMBERS OF THE STATE
HIGHWAY PATROL
SECTION 4.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Reserve for Compensation Increases to provide pay raises for the State Highway Patrol &
Law Enforcement Support Staff the sum of forty million four hundred eighty-two thousand four
hundred eighty dollars ($40,482,480) in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to establish
the pay scales set forth in this section.
SECTION 4.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the law enforcement officers of the State
Highway Patrol shall be paid based upon the following experience-based annual salary schedule:
Years of Experience 2025-2027 Biennium
0 $56,000
1 $62,125
2 $68,250
3 $75,375
4 $80,500
5 $86,625
6 $92,750
7 $98,875
8+ $105,000
SECTION 4.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, sworn State Highway Patrol employees who
are not subject to an experience-based annual salary schedule shall be paid at the following rates
by rank:
Rank 2025-2027 Biennium
Sergeant $120,750
First Sergeant $132,825
Lieutenant $146,108
Captain $160,718
Major $176,790
Lieutenant Colonel $194,469
Deputy Commander $204,193
Colonel $224,612

JUVENILE JUSTICE PROGRAM SUPPORT AND STAFFING
SECTION 5. Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Public Safety, Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency
Prevention (JJDP), the sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in recurring funds to
address staffing shortfalls and stabilize juvenile facility operations and juvenile court services,
including recruitment and retention initiatives for hard-to-fill positions, experience-based salary
schedule implementation or other compensation adjustments for frontline and supervisory
classifications, training and onboarding capacity, and temporary staffing measures necessary to
Page 4 House Bill 1080-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
maintain safe staffing coverage while vacancies are filled. The JJDP shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the Fiscal Research Division, and
the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees no later than
March 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, on the use of funds and outcomes, including vacancy
rates, turnover, time-to-hire, and overtime hours.

STATE CRIME LAB WORKFORCE COMPETITIVENESS
SECTION 6. Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Justice, the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in
recurring funds to support the State Crime Laboratory in recruiting and retaining qualified
personnel in a competitive labor market, including salary adjustments, targeted recruitment and
retention incentives for hard-to-fill positions, and related workforce supports necessary to
maintain timely and reliable forensic services. The Department shall report to the Fiscal Research
Division and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety by March
1, 2027, and annually thereafter, on the use of funds and outcomes, including vacancy rates,
turnover, time-to-hire, and turnaround times for major casework disciplines.

ENHANCE THE BENEFITS OF CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS WHO ARE MEMBERS
OF THE TEACHERS' AND STATE EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 135-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-1. Definitions.
The following words and phrases as used in this Chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context, shall have the following meanings:
…
(7e) "Correctional officer" means an employee of an employer who is certified as
a State criminal justice officer under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter
17C of the General Statutes.
…
(11c) "Law-Enforcement Officer" means a full-time paid employee of an employer
who is actively serving in a position with assigned primary duties and
responsibilities for prevention and detection of crime or the general
enforcement of the criminal laws of the State of North Carolina or serving
civil processes, and who possesses the power of arrest by virtue of an oath
administered under the authority of the State. "Law-Enforcement Officer" also
means a all of the following:
a. A probation/parole officer as defined in this section with respect to any
service rendered on or after July 1, 2017.
b. A correctional officer, as defined in this section, with respect to any
service rendered on or after July 1, 2026.
…."
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 143-166.41 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.41. Special separation allowance options for State law enforcement officers.
…
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Allowance. – The annual special separation allowance for State law
enforcement officers provided for under this section.
(1a) Correctional officer. – As defined in G.S. 135-1.
(2) Creditable service. – The service for which credit is allowed under the
retirement system of which the officer is a member.
(3) Law enforcement officer. – As defined in either G.S. 135-1 or
G.S. 143-166.30(a).
House Bill 1080-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Officer. – A law enforcement officer.
(5) Probation/parole officer. – As defined in G.S. 135-1.
(b1) Eligibility for Allowance and Calculation of Allowance Amount. – To be eligible for
an allowance under this section, an officer is required to meet one of the following sets of criteria
that shall also determine the allowance amount:
(1) For officers meeting all of the following criteria, the annual special separation
allowance to be paid is equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the
annual base rate of compensation most recently applicable to the officer for
each year of that officer's creditable service:
a. The officer (i) has completed 30 or more years of creditable service or
(ii) is 55 years of age or older and completed five or more years of
creditable service.
b. The officer is less than 62 years of age.
c. The officer has completed at least five years of continuous service as
a law enforcement officer immediately preceding the officer's service
retirement. Any break in this required continuous service that is a
result of disability retirement or disability salary continuation benefits
shall not adversely affect an officer's qualification to receive an
allowance under this subdivision so long as the officer returned to
service within 45 days after the disability benefits had ceased and is
otherwise qualified to receive the allowance.
d. At least fifty percent (50%) of the officer's creditable service is as
meets one or more of the following:
1. The service is as a law enforcement officer, or for officer.
2. For service prior to July 1, 2017, the service is as a
probation/parole officer.
3. For service prior to July 1, 2026, the service is as a correctional
officer.
(2) For officers meeting all of the following criteria, the annual special separation
allowance to be paid is equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the
annual equivalent of the base rate of compensation at the time the officer
attained 30 years of service multiplied by 30:
a. Prior to attaining 62 years of age, the officer has completed 30 or more
years of creditable service, at least fifty percent (50%) of which was
the officer's creditable service met one or more of the following:
1. The service was as a law enforcement officer, or for officer.
2. For service prior to July 1, 2017, the service was as a
probation/parole officer.
3. For service prior to July 1, 2026, the service was as a
correctional officer.
b. The officer has completed at least five years of continuous service as
a law enforcement officer immediately preceding the officer's service
retirement. Any break in this required continuous service that is a
result of disability retirement or disability salary continuation benefits
shall not adversely affect an officer's qualification to receive an
allowance under this subdivision so long as the officer returned to
service within 45 days after the disability benefits had ceased and is
otherwise qualified to receive the allowance.
If an officer meets all of the criteria under each subdivision of this subsection, then the
employer making the allowance payments shall allow the officer to choose which of the two
calculation formulas to use for that officer's allowance. This election by the officer is a one-time,
Page 6 House Bill 1080-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
irrevocable election and shall be made prior to the first allowance payment. If no election is made
by the officer, then the calculation amount under subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be used.
…."
SECTION 7.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
State Treasurer the sum of eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in
the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the purposes of providing the enhanced benefits under this section.
SECTION 7.(d) This section is effective July 1, 2026.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1080-First Edition Page 7